Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2514.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 237A.13A State child care assistance ââ child care workforce. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of section 237A.13 or 237A.14 to the contrary, a child shall be eligible for the state child care assistance program established in section 237A.13 if a parent, guardian, or custodian of the child meets all of the following requirements, as applicable: a. The parent, guardian, or custodian is employed at a child care facility or child care home located in this state, and the child care facility or child care home has an agreement with the department to accept reimbursement from the state child care assistance program. b. The parent, guardian, or custodian works in a child care facility or child care home located in this state an average minimum of thirty-two hours per week during the month in a position with a primary duty of providing child care directly to children, and is regularly counted in the minimum child-to-staff ratio established by the department by rule. c. (1) If the parent, guardian, or custodian is employed at a child care home or a child development home, the parent, guardian, or custodian does not provide child care to the parentâs, guardianâs, or custodianâs own child. House File 2514, p. 2 (2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), a co-provider at a child development home may qualify for state child care assistance if the co-provider meets all requirements specified in this section and by the department by rule. d. The parent, guardian, or custodian is not a substitute or an assistant at a child care home or a child development home. e. Based on the departmentâs evaluation of the parentâs, guardianâs, or custodianâs application for state child care assistance, the department has determined the parent, guardian, or custodian has a need for child care. f. The parent, guardian, or custodian is not the owner of the child care facility or child care home where the parentâs, guardianâs, or custodianâs child is enrolled. 2. A director, co-director, or other administrative staff member of a child care facility may qualify for state child care assistance under subsection 1 if such individual is regularly counted in the minimum child-to-staff ratio established by the department by rule. 3. A parent, guardian, or custodian of a child participating in the state child care assistance program pursuant to eligibility established under this section shall make copayments as specified by the department by rule. 4. No later than December 1 of each year, the department shall submit a report to the general assembly relating to participation in the state child care assistance program under this section. The report must include all of the following: a. The dollar amount of state moneys spent to reimburse child care providers during the immediately preceding fiscal year. b. The dollar amount of federal moneys spent to reimburse child care providers during the immediately preceding fiscal year. c. The dollar amount of state moneys spent on administrative costs during the immediately preceding fiscal year. d. The dollar amount of federal moneys spent on administrative costs during the immediately preceding fiscal year. e. The total number of participating families. f. The total number of participating children. House File 2514, p. 3 g. The average gross household income for participating families. h. The number of participating families for each of the following levels of gross household income: (1) Above one hundred sixty percent but below one hundred eighty percent of the federal poverty level. (2) At or above one hundred eighty percent but below two hundred percent of the federal poverty level. (3) At or above two hundred percent but below two hundred twenty percent of the federal poverty level. (4) At or above two hundred twenty percent but below two hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level. (5) At or above two hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level. 5. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this section. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2514, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor